hu: Faforma: Háromszög alakú; Hátul lapos; Teljes; Fél; Ceruza; Sudár; Asztali; Gally; Fejjel lefelé; Egyéb
nl: Boomvorm: Hoek; Muurboom; Volledig; Half; Potlood; Slank; Tafelblad; Twijg; Ondersteboven; Overig
hr-HR: Oblik drveća: Kut; Ravno odostraga; Puni; Polovični; Olovka; Slim; Stolni; Grančica; Naopako; Ostalo
vi: Hình dáng cây: Góc; Lưng phẳng; Toàn bộ; Nửa; Bút chì; Ôm vừa vặn; Trên mặt bàn; Cành cây nhỏ; Lộn ngược; Khác
ko: 트리 형태: 코너형; 플랫백; 전체; 하프; 연필; 슬림; 테이블탑; 잔가지형; 역삼각형; 기타
pl: Kształt drzewa: Narożne; Z płaskim tyłem; Pełne; Połówkowe; Wąskie; Smukłe; Stołowe; Gałęziasta; Odwrócona; Inne
sv: Trädform: Hörn; Platt rygg; Full; Halv; Pennkjol; Slim; Bord; Kvist; Upp och ner; Annat
en: Tree shape: Corner; Flat back; Full; Half; Pencil; Slim; Tabletop; Twig; Upside-down; Other
it: Forma dell'albero: Angolo; Retro piatto; Pieno; Mezzo; Matita; Slim; Da tavolo; Ramoscello; Sottosopra; Altro
el: Σχήμα δέντρου: Γωνιακό; Με επίπεδη πλάτη; Πλήρες; Μισό; Μολύβι; Λεπτό; Επιτραπέζια; Κλαδάκι; Ανάποδα; Άλλο
th: รูปทรงต้นไม้: มุม; หลังแบน; ทั้งหมด; ครึ่ง; Pencil; ทรงสลิม; ตั้งโต๊ะ; กิ่งก้าน; รูปทรงกลับหัว; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 树木形状: 角形; 平背形; 完整型; 半型; 铅笔型; 纤细型; 桌面型; 曲枝; 倒挂; 其他
zh-TW: 樹型: 角落; 平背; 全面的; 半弧型; 鉛筆形; 細長形; 桌上型; 樹枝; 倒栽樹; 其他
cs: Tvar stromu: Do rohu; Zploštělé po jedné straně; Plný tvar; Poloviční; Úzké; Štíhlé; Stolní; Větvička; Vzhůru nohama; Jiné
bg-BG: Форма на дървото: Ъгъл; Плосък гръб; Цяло; Половин; Молив; Тънко; За маса; Клонка; С главата надолу; Друго
ja: 木の形状: コーナー; フラットバック; フル; ハーフ; ペンシル; スリム; 卓上; 小枝; 上下逆; その他
sl-SI: Oblika drevesa: Kotna; Z ravnim hrbtom; Polna; Polovična; Oprijet; Oprijet; Namizni; Vejica; Na glavo obrnjeno; Druga
es: Forma del árbol: Esquina; Respaldo plano; Total; Medio; Lápiz; Corte delgado; Sobremesa; Ramita; Al revés; Otros
fi: Puun muoto: Kulma; Tasattu selkäpuoli; Täysimittainen; Puolikas; Kynämäinen; Hoikka; Pöydällä pidettävä; Oksa; Ylösalaisin; Muu
tr: Ağaç şekli: Köşe; Düz arkalı; Tam; Yarım; Kalem; İnce; Masaüstü; Dal; Tersine çevrilmiş; Diğer
lt-LT: Medžio forma: Kampinis; Plokščia nugarėlė; Stora; Pusinė; Pieštuko formos; Plona; Stalinė; Šakelė; Apverstas aukštyn kojomis; Kita
ro-RO: Forma copacului: De colț; Spate plat; Standard; Jumătate; Creion; Subțire; De masă; Ramură; Invers; Altele
nb: Treets form: Hjørne; Flatrygg; Full; Halv; Blyant; Slank; Bordplate; Kvist; Opp-ned; Annet
fr: Forme de l’arbre: Coin; Dos plat; Complet; Demi; Crayon; Slim; De table; Rameau; Inversé; Autre
de: Baumform: Ecke; Flache Rückseite; Vollständig; Halb; Bleistift; Slim; Tischgerät; Zweig; Verkehrt herum; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Formato da árvore: Canto; Plana; Completa; Meia; Lápis; Magro; Tampo de mesa; Galho; Invertido; Outro
ru: Форма дерева: Угловое; С плоской задней частью; Классическое; Полудерево; Очень узкое; Зауженное; Настольное; Ветка; Перевернутая; Другое
sk-SK: Tvar stromu: Rohový; Plochá zadná strana; Plný; Polovičný; Ceruzka; Štíhly; Stolový; S vetvičkami; Hore nohami; Iné
pt-PT: Forma da árvore: Canto; Parte traseira plana; Cheia; Metade; Lápis; Esguia; Tampo de mesa; Galho; Invertida; Outro
da: Træform: Hjørne; Flad bund; Fuldt; Halvt; Blyant; Slim; Bordplade; Kvist; På hovedet; Andet